Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES REFERRAL SERVICE

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1197, see section 1 of chapter 114, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

29-11-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that obtaining access to appropriate community-based organizations and governmental agencies providing for human services is a critical first step for many individuals and families of Colorado to receiving the help and assistance they need. In 2000, in recognition of the need to promote effective access to human services, the federal communications commission reserved the three-digit telephone number of 2-1-1 for access to community health and human services information. The public utilities commission approved the use of a 2-1-1 number for Colorado in October of 2002. The public utilities commission assigned the 2-1-1 dial code to the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative. The 2-1-1 human services referral service is dedicated to providing individuals and families with referral information to obtain nonemergency services such as food assistance, shelter, job assistance, and low-cost health care, for those in need. Due to the importance of the human services referral system and the need to assure that this system is enabled in all areas of the state of Colorado, the general assembly hereby finds and declares that the 2-1-1 human services referral service providers should receive protection of immunity that is similar to the protection afforded to the 9-1-1 emergency service.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 12, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 2020:

Entire part amended, (HB 20-1197), ch. 114, p. 476, § 2, effective June 22.

29-11-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(1.5) "Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative" means the group authorized by the public utilities commission to establish the provision of human services referral services in the state of Colorado.

Repealed.

"Human services referral service provider" means an entity that is authorized by the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative to provide health and human services referral information.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 13, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 2020:

Entire part amended, (HB 20-1197), ch. 114, p. 476, § 2, effective June 22.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (SB 21-239), ch. 266, p. 1546, § 1, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

IP and (1) amended, (1.5) added, and (2) and (4) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1576, § 196, effective July 1.

29-11-203. Human services referral service - immunity - grant - report - repeal.

The Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative, human services referral service provider, or employee, agent, or financial supporter thereof is not liable to any person or entity for any damages in a civil action for injuries, death, or loss to person or property incurred as a result of any act or omission of the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative, human services referral service provider, or any employee or agent thereof in connection with developing, adopting, authorizing, implementing, maintaining, enhancing, or operating a referral service unless such damage or injury was intentionally caused by or resulted from gross negligence of the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative, human services referral service provider, employee, agent, or financial supporter in connection with the provision of human services referral service.

The Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative, human services referral service provider, or employee, agent, or financial supporter thereof is not liable to any person or entity for infringement or invasion of the right of privacy of any person caused or claimed to have been caused, directly or indirectly, by any act or omission in connection with the provision of human service referral information to any person or entity unless the infringement or invasion of the right of privacy arose out of the gross negligence or other wrongful and intentional act of the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative, human services referral service provider, employee, agent, or financial supporter thereof.

Repealed.

(3.2) (a) During the 2023 legislative session, the BHA shall include in its report to the committees of reference pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203 information from the BHA regarding its contract with the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section prior to its repeal in 2022, and the impact of the statewide communication system on behavioral health referrals and access to behavioral health services and other resources.

This subsection (3.2) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

For the 2021-22 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall annually appropriate one million dollars from the general fund to the department for the issuance of annual grants to the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative for operational expenses including, but not limited to:

Implementing a quality control program to ensure a high level of caller satisfaction;

Implementing data collection quality control to ensure a high level of accuracy in collecting caller information and identifying caller needs;

Providing services in over three hundred languages;

Researching and curating the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative database of community-based organization resources; and

Dispatching and scheduling ride share rides for callers in need of transportation.

Any money appropriated to the department for a fiscal year pursuant to this subsection (4) that is not expended before the fiscal year ends is further appropriated to the department for the subsequent fiscal year for the same purpose.

To qualify for the grants awarded by the department pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the Colorado 2-1-1 collaborative must serve as a statewide communication system, host multiple call centers across the state, and provide referrals to one or more of the following:

Housing, including shelters and transitional services;

Rent and utility assistance services;

Income support and assistance services;

Childcare services;

Food services;

Individual, family, and community support services;

Transportation services;

Clothing, personal, and household needs services;

Health-care services;

Mental health and substance use disorders services;

Employment services;

Education services;

Medical clinics services;

Dental clinics services;

Other government and economic services; and

Disaster services.

On or before December 31, 2022, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter, and notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), for as long as annual grants are made pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the department shall submit a summarized report to the health and human services committee of the senate and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, on the grants issued pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 13, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 2020:

Entire part amended, (HB 20-1197), ch. 114, p. 476, § 2, effective June 22.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-178), ch. 134, p. 547, § 5, effective May 13; (3)(a) and (3)(c) amended and (3)(b.5) and (3.2) added, (SB 21-239), ch. 266, p. 1546, § 2, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

(4), (5), and (6) added, (HB 22-1315), ch. 360, p. 2576, § 2, effective June 3; (3.2)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1577, § 197, effective July 1.